Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.075

Motion to set aside indictment—Grounds not allowed, when.

The ground of the motion to set aside the indictment mentioned in the fourth subdivision of RCW 10.40.070 is not allowed to a defendant who has been held to answer before indictment.

[Code 1881 s 1047; RRS s 2100. Formerly RCW 10.40.070, part.]